ro-RO: Tip zornăitor: Mărgele multiple; Nu; Bila de tungsten; Da; Altele
th: ประเภทเขย่า: ลูกปัดหลายเม็ด; ไม่; ทังสเตนน็อก; ใช่; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Rattle tipo: Múltiplas contas; Não; Batida de tungstênio; Sim; Outros
zh-TW: 搖鈴類型: 多珠; 否; 鎢珠敲擊音; 是; 其他
pl: Typ grzechotki: Wielokoralikowa; Nie; Pojedyncza kulka (Tungsten knock); Tak; Inne
en: Rattle type: Multiple beads; No; Tungsten knock; Yes; Other
nl: Rateltype: Meerdere kralen; Nee; Tungsten knock; Ja; Overig
cs: Typ chrastítka: Více kuliček; Ne; Wolframové ťukání; Ano; Ostatní
nb: Rasletype: Flere perler; Nei; Volfram-klakk; Ja; Annet
fi: Räminätyyppi: Useita helmiä; Ei; Volframikolina; Kyllä; Muu
hu: Csörgőtípus: Több gyöngy; Nem; Volfrám golyó; Igen; Egyéb
ja: ラトルタイプ: 複数ビーズ; なし; タングステンノック; あり; その他
da: Rangletype: Flere perler; Nej; Tungsten knock; Ja; Andet
sk-SK: Typ hrkálky: Viacero guľôčok; Nie; Volfrámové teliesko; Áno; Iné
ko: 딸랑이 유형: 다중 구슬; 아니요; 텅스텐 노크; 예; 기타
bg-BG: Тип дрънкалка: Множество мъниста; Не; Волфрамово тракане; Да; Други
fr: Type de bruiteur: Multiples perles; Non; Bille en tungstène; Oui; Autre
ru: Тип погремушки: Несколько шариков; Нет; Вольфрамовый стук; Да; Другое
de: Rasseltyp: Mehrere Perlen; Nein; Tungsten Knock; Ja; Sonstige
it: Tipo di sonaglio: Perline multiple; No; Battacchio in tungsteno; Sì; Altro
tr: Çıngırak tipi: Çoklu boncuk; Hayır; Tungsten vuruşu; Evet; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta zvečke: Više perli; Ne; Zvečka od volframa; Da; Ostalo
es: Tipo de sonajero: Múltiples cuentas; No; Golpe de tungsteno; Sí; Otro
vi: Loại lục lạc: Nhiều hạt; Không; Bi chấn vonfram; Có; Khác
lt-LT: Barškėjimo tipas: Keli karoliukai; Ne; Volframo barškėjimas; Taip; Kita
el: Τύπος κροτάλου: Πολλαπλές χάντρες; Όχι; Κρούση βολφραμίου; Ναι; Άλλο
zh-CN: 响珠类型: 多珠; 否; 钨珠撞击声; 是; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta ropotulje: Več kroglic; Ne; Trkanje volframa; Da; Drugo
sv: Skrammeltyp: Flera kulor; Nej; Volframkula; Ja; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de catraca: Várias contas; Não; Batida de tungsténio; Sim; Outro